North Dakota, session 69, HB1416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 53-06.1-03 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. A licensed organization or organization that has a permit shall conduct games as
follows:
a. Only one licensed organization or organization that has a permit may conduct
games at an authorized site on a day, except a:
(1) A raffle or a sports pool conducted under a local permit may be conducted
for a special occasion by another licensed organization or organization that
has a permit when one of these conditions is met:
(1) (a) When the area for the raffle or a sports pool is physically separated
from the area where games are conducted by the regular
organization.
(2) (b) Upon request of the regular organization and with the approval of the
alcoholic beverage establishment, the regular organization's license or
permit is suspended for that specific time of day by the attorney
general.
(2) Two organizations may consent to conduct two different types of games on
the same day at the same site for a period not to exceed twelve hours per
day, if:
Page No. 1 25.0923.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(a) The site is located in a city with a population of one thousand two
hundred or less;
(b) Each organization employs its own staff; and
(c) Funds from gaming are not commingled.
b. Except for a temporary site authorized for fourteen or fewer consecutive days for
not more than two events per quarter or a licensed organization authorized on or
before January 1, 2023, to conduct gaming at more than fifteen sites, a licensed
organization, including a closely related organization, may not have more than
fifteen sites.
c. Games of electronic quick shot bingo, electronic pull tabs, pull tabs,
punchboards, twenty-one, paddlewheels, poker, and sports pools may be
conducted only during the hours when alcoholic beverages may be dispensed
according to applicable regulations of the state, county, or city. Electronic pull
tabs must be conducted in a designated area where patrons must be twenty-one
years of age or older to enter.
d. An organization may not permit a person under twenty-one years of age to
directly or indirectly play pull tabs, punchboards, twenty-one, calcuttas, sports
pools, paddlewheels, or poker. An organization may not permit an individual
under eighteen years of age to directly or indirectly play electronic quick shot
bingo. An organization may not permit an individual under eighteen years of age
to directly or indirectly play bingo unless the individual is accompanied by an
adult, bingo is conducted by an organization that has a permit, or the game's
prize structure does not exceed that allowed for a permit.
e. An organization may not install more than ten electronic pull tab devices at a site.
f. An organization with more than fifteen licensed sites under subdivision b may not
increase its number of sites beyond the number of sites licensed as of January 1,
2023.
g. An organization conducting gaming at an authorized site on January 1, 2023,
may continue to operate gaming, including as provided under subsection 1 of
section 53-06.1-06, at the authorized site regardless of whether the authorized
site is an alcoholic beverage establishment as defined under section 53-06.1-01.
Page No. 2 25.0923.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
h. For a raffle board, an organization permitted to conduct raffles shall sell the
numbered squares on the board for the same price and may sell squares at a site
thirty days before the drawing.
Page No. 3 25.0923.02000